Texas, session 891, HB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 171.061, Health and Safety Code, is amended by amending Subdivision (8-a) and adding Subdivision (8-b) to read as follows: (8-a)  "Provide" means, as used with regard to abortion-inducing drugs, any act of giving, selling, dispensing, administering, transferring possession, or otherwise providing or prescribing an abortion-inducing drug. The term does not include an activity described by Section 171.2011(b). (8-b)  "Supplier of an abortion-inducing drug" means a person engaged in the business of providing abortion-inducing drugs to patients for the purpose of obtaining an abortion. SECTION 2.  Section 171.063, Health and Safety Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a), (b-1), and (c) and adding Subsection (b-2) to read as follows: (a)  A person may not knowingly provide an abortion-inducing drug to a pregnant woman for the purpose of inducing an abortion in the pregnant woman or enabling another person to induce an abortion in the pregnant woman unless: (1)  the person who provides the abortion-inducing drug is a physician; and (2)  the provision of the abortion-inducing drug is in response to a medical emergency [satisfies the protocol authorized by this subchapter]. (b-1)  A manufacturer, supplier of an abortion-inducing drug, physician, or any other person may not provide to a patient any abortion-inducing drug by courier, delivery by a common or contract carrier, or mail service. (b-2)  It is an exception to the application of Subsection (b-1) that: (1)  the person providing the abortion-inducing drug is: (A)  a physician; (B)  a health facility licensed under Subtitle B, Title 4; or (C)  a pharmacy or pharmacist licensed under Subtitle J, Title 3, Occupations Code; and (2)  the provision of the abortion-inducing drug: (A)  constitutes an activity described by Section 171.2011(b); (B)  is in response to a medical emergency; or (C)  is for a medical reason other than to attempt, induce, or perform an abortion. (c)  Before the physician provides an abortion-inducing drug, the physician must: (1)  examine the pregnant woman in person; and (2)  independently verify that a pregnancy exists, including a pregnancy located outside the uterus [; [(3)  document, in the woman's medical record, the gestational age and location of the pregnancy to determine whether an ectopic pregnancy exists as defined by Section 245.002(4-a); [(4)  determine the pregnant woman's blood type, and for a woman who is Rh negative, offer to administer Rh immunoglobulin (RhoGAM) at the time the abortion-inducing drug is administered or used or the abortion is performed or induced to prevent Rh incompatibility, complications, or miscarriage in future pregnancies; [(5)  document whether the pregnant woman received treatment for Rh negativity, as diagnosed by the most accurate standard of medical care; and [(6)  ensure the physician does not provide an abortion-inducing drug for a pregnant woman whose pregnancy is more than 49 days of gestational age]. SECTION 3.  Subchapter D, Chapter 171, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Sections 171.0651, 171.0652, 171.067, 171.068, 171.069, and 171.070 to read as follows: Sec. 171.0651.  CERTAIN ACTIVITIES NOT SUBJECT TO PROSECUTION. A person is not subject to prosecution as a party under Sections 7.01 and 7.02, Penal Code, or for organized criminal activity under Chapter 71, Penal Code, for any underlying conduct that is an activity described by Section 171.2011. Sec. 171.0652.  PROSECUTION BY ATTORNEY GENERAL. Notwithstanding any other law, the attorney general has jurisdiction to prosecute and may represent the state in the prosecution of an offense under Section 171.065 that is based on a violation of Section 171.063(b-1). Sec. 171.067.  CIVIL PENALTY; INJUNCTION. (a) Except as provided by Section 171.069, the attorney general may bring a civil action against a person who violates Section 171.063(b-1) to enjoin the violation or recover a civil penalty. (b)  A district court located in a county of proper venue under Chapter 15, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, has jurisdiction over a civil action brought under this section if any element of the alleged violation occurred in this state. (c)  If the trier of fact finds that a defendant against whom an action is brought under this section violated Section 171.063(b-1), the court shall impose a civil penalty of not less than $100,000 for each violation. Sec. 171.068.  QUI TAM ACTION FOR CERTAIN PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES. (a) A person may bring a civil action against a person who violates Section 171.063(b-1) in the name of the person and of this state to enjoin the violation and recover statutory damages in the amount of $100,000 per violation. (b)  A person may not bring an action under this section later than the second anniversary of the date the alleged violation of Section 171.063(b-1) occurred. (c)  Except as provided by this subchapter, a civil action brought under this section is subject to the same procedures and requirements applicable to a civil action brought under Subchapter C, Chapter 36, Human Resources Code, including any provision of that subchapter authorizing the attorney general to intervene and resolve an action a person brings under that subchapter. Sec. 171.069.  PROCEDURES FOR CIVIL ACTIONS. (a) A person may not bring a civil action under this subchapter against a woman who: (1)  aborts or attempts to abort her unborn child; or (2)  uses, obtains, or seeks to obtain an abortion-inducing drug to abort or attempt to abort her unborn child. (b)  The courts of this state have personal jurisdiction over a defendant against whom an action is brought under this subchapter to the maximum extent permitted by the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution and the defendant may be served outside this state. (c)  If the attorney general prevails in an action brought under Section 171.067 or in which the attorney general intervened under Section 171.068, the attorney general is entitled to recover reasonable and necessary attorney's fees, expenses, and court costs. Sec. 171.070.  REMEDIES CUMULATIVE. A civil or criminal action authorized by this subchapter is in addition to any other civil or criminal action provided by this subchapter. SECTION 4.  Sections 171.063(d), (e), and (f), Health and Safety Code, are repealed. SECTION 5.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to a cause of action that accrues on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 6.  Except as otherwise provided by this Act, the changes in law made by this Act apply only to conduct engaged in on or after the effective date of this Act.  Conduct engaged in before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the offense was committed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose.  For purposes of this section, conduct was engaged in before the effective date of this Act if any element of the conduct occurred before that date. SECTION 7.  (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Texas Supreme Court has exclusive and original jurisdiction over a challenge to the constitutionality of this Act or any part of this Act and may issue injunctive or declaratory relief in connection with the challenge. (b)  A person has standing to challenge the constitutionality of this Act if the person: (1)  is a manufacturer, supplier of an abortion-inducing drug, distributor, or other person who provides abortion-inducing drugs, as defined by Section 171.061, Health and Safety Code, for use in this state; and (2)  has contacts sufficient to subject the person to personal jurisdiction in a civil action brought in a court of this state, without regard to whether those contacts involve conduct on which a civil action may be based as provided by this Act. (c)  Section 22.001(d), Government Code, applies to an action challenging the constitutionality of this Act. (d)  Chapter 27, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, does not apply to an action challenging the constitutionality of this Act. (e)  The Texas Supreme Court shall render a final judgment in an action challenging the constitutionality of this Act not later than the 180th day after the date the action is filed. SECTION 8.  This Act takes effect December 1, 2025.